Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
Article 1 General Provisions

13-3-1.
Essentials of contracts generally.

To constitute a valid contract, there must be parties able to contract, a consideration moving to the contract, the assent of the parties to the terms of the contract, and a subject matter upon which the contract can operate.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2682; Code 1868, § 2678; Code 1873, § 2720; Code 1882, § 2720; Civil Code 1895, § 3637; Civil Code 1910, § 4222; Code 1933, § 20-107.

Parties’ authority to contract. —

Upon admitting a parent to a nursing home, an adult child’s signature on an arbitration agreement did not bind the parent because the child was not the parent’s agent by virtue of being the child and there was no evidence that the parent had authorized the child to act for the parent as required by O.C.G.A. §10-6-1. McKean v. GGNSC Atlanta, LLC, 329 Ga. App. 507, 765 S.E.2d 681, 2014 Ga. App. LEXIS 725 (2014).

Parties’ authority to contract for elderly parent. —

Motion to enforce an arbitration agreement was properly denied as a valid and enforceable arbitration agreement did not exist because, although the decedent’s daughter signed a nursing home admission agreement and an arbitration agreement, the decedent did not personally assent to the arbitration agreement; and the daughter did not have express or implied authority to sign the arbitration agreement on the decedent’s behalf as the decedent did not execute any written document expressly authorizing the daughter to act for the decedent, and none of the words or conduct of the decedent could have caused the nursing home to believe that the decedent consented to having the arbitration agreement signed on the decedent’s behalf by the daughter. United Health Servs. of Ga., Inc. v. Alexander, 342 Ga. App. 1, 802 S.E.2d 314, 2017 Ga. App. LEXIS 302 (2017), cert. denied, No. S17C1926, 2017 Ga. LEXIS 1020 (Ga. Dec. 11, 2017).

Parties must be legal entities. —

A valid contract requires parties who are legal entities. Horn v. Wright, 157 Ga. App. 408, 278 S.E.2d 66, 1981 Ga. App. LEXIS 1845 (1981).

Presumption, as against general demurrer of parties’ capacity and assent to terms of contract

by parties execution thereof. Martell v. Atlanta Biltmore Hotel Corp., 114 Ga. App. 646, 152 S.E.2d 579, 1966 Ga. App. LEXIS 884 (1966).

Partial performance as supplying mutuality and consideration. —

Even if a contract might not be enforceable on the ground that the contract was without consideration and mutuality, partial performance of the contract supplies the lack of mutuality and renders the contract enforceable. Hill Aircraft & Leasing Corp. v. Planes, Inc., 158 Ga. App. 151, 279 S.E.2d 250, 1981 Ga. App. LEXIS 2108 (1981).

Parties must assent to all terms in same sense. —

Valid contract is never complete until parties assent to all terms of proposed contract in same sense. Associated Muts., Inc. v. Pope Lumber Co., 200 Ga. 487, 37 S.E.2d 393, 1946 Ga. LEXIS 412 (1946).

Parties must assent to all essential terms of the contract, and since the timber buyer and the timber seller did not agree on the essential element of the length of the “cutting term,” no contract was formed between the parties and the timber seller was required to return the timber buyer’s option purchase money. Peace v. Dominy Holdings, Inc., 51 Ga. App. 654, 554 S.E.2d 314, 2001 Ga. App. LEXIS 1003 (2001).

Owner of property adjacent to a bankruptcy debtor’s private airport did not have an easement to use the airport through a declarations document of homeowners since not all homeowners executed the document, the document was not in final form, and thus there was no assent to the terms of the document. Flyboy Aviation Props., LLC v. Franck, 501 Bankr. 808, 2013 Bankr. LEXIS 4532 (Bankr. N.D. Ga. 2013).

Parties bound by agreement although subject matter not in existence at time of contracting. —

If contract amounts to executory agreement for bona fide sale of property of character such as under circumstances and under law can be legally made subject matter of a sale, and is not merely speculative in character, parties may be bound, although subject matter of sale has no existence at time agreement is entered upon, and seller expects to comply with the contract by subsequently acquiring property thus agreed to be conveyed. Parks v. Washington & L.R.R., 35 Ga. App. 635, 133 S.E. 634, 1926 Ga. App. LEXIS 1043 (1926).

13-3-2.
Contract incomplete without assent of parties to terms thereof; withdrawal of bid or proposition by party.

The consent of the parties being essential to a contract, until each has assented to all the terms, there is no binding contract; until assented to, each party may withdraw his bid or proposition.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2689; Code 1868, § 2685; Code 1873, § 2727; Code 1882, § 2727; Civil Code 1895, § 3645; Civil Code 1910, § 4230; Code 1933, § 20-108.

13-3-3.
When written acceptance of offer made by letter takes effect; acceptance of offer containing alternative propositions.

If an offer is made by letter, an acceptance by written reply takes effect from the time it is sent and not from the time it is received; hence, withdrawal of the offer by the offeror after that time is ineffective. If an offer contains alternative propositions, the party receiving the offer may elect between the alternative propositions.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2690; Code 1868, § 2686; Code 1873, § 2728; Code 1882, § 2728; Civil Code 1895, § 3646; Civil Code 1910, § 4231; Code 1933, § 20-114.

13-3-4.
Effect of conditions precedent or subsequent upon rights of parties under contracts.

Conditions may be precedent or subsequent. A condition precedent must be performed before the contract becomes absolute and obligatory upon the other party. The breach of a condition subsequent may destroy the party’s rights under the contract or may give a right to damages to the other party, according to a true construction of the intention of the parties.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2684; Code 1868, § 2680; Code 1873, § 2722; Code 1882, § 2722; Civil Code 1895, § 3639; Civil Code 1910, § 4224; Code 1933, § 20-110.

13-3-5.
Effect of impossible, immoral, and illegal conditions.

Impossible, immoral, and illegal conditions are void and are binding upon no one.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2685; Code 1868, § 2681; Code 1873, § 2723; Code 1882, § 2723; Civil Code 1895, § 3640; Civil Code 1910, § 4225; Code 1933, § 20-111.